Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF168.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1892YH (3) 91 jda/jh H.F. 168 Section 1. Section 256.9, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 69. a. Develop, in consultation with 3 a statewide organization representing teachers, a statewide 4 organization representing school boards, and area education 5 agencies, a list of the rights and services that are available 6 to students who are enrolled in school districts, and the 7 parents or guardians of such students, that are not available 8 to students who are enrolled in nonpublic schools, or the 9 parents or guardians of such students. 10 b. Distribute to nonpublic schools the list developed 11 pursuant to paragraph âaâ . 12 c. For purposes of this subsection, ânonpublic schoolâ means 13 the same as defined in section 285.16. 14 Sec. 2. Section 257.11B, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 15 following new subsection: 16 NEW SUBSECTION . 12. Each nonpublic school that accepts 17 payment from a parent or guardian using funds from a pupilâs 18 individual account in the education savings account fund 19 must provide the parent or guardian with a copy of the list 20 developed by the director of the department of education and 21 distributed to the nonpublic school pursuant to section 256.9, 22 subsection 69. 23